src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON-INDEF_NIMITTUINE !!≈ @CODE@ nimittuine:ni«mittu
+Indef+Neg+Sg+Abl:%>malpäi K ;
+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ade:%>mal K ;
+Indef+Neg+Sg+All:%>male K ;
+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ela:%>maspäi K ;
+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ess:%>mannu K ;
+Indef+Neg+Sg+Gen:%>man K ;
+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ill:%>mah K ;
+Indef+Neg+Sg+Ine:%>mas K ;
+Indef+Neg+Sg+Nom:ine K ;
+Indef+Neg+Sg+Par:%>mua K ;
+Indef+Neg+Pl+Abl:%>milpäi K ;
+Indef+Neg+Pl+Ade:%>mil K ;
+Indef+Neg+Pl+All:%>mile K ;
+Indef+Neg+Pl+Ela:%>mispäi K ;
+Indef+Neg+Pl+Ess:%>minnu K ;
+Indef+Neg+Pl+Gen:%>mien K ;
+Indef+Neg+Pl+Ill:%>mih K ;
+Indef+Neg+Pl+Ine:%>mis K ;
+Indef+Neg+Pl+Nom:%>mat K ;
+Indef+Neg+Pl+Par:%>mii K ;


!! ### INTERROGATIVE
LEXICON PRON-INTERR_ !!≈ @CODE@ Still requires work
+Interr: K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_MI !!≈ @CODE@ mi:mi
+Interr+Pl+Nom:t K ;
+Interr+Sg+Ela:späi K ;
+Interr+Sg+Gen:n K ;
+Interr+Sg+Ill:h K ;
+Interr+Sg+Ine:s K ;
+Interr+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Interr+Sg+Par:dä K ;
+Interr+Sg+Tra:kse K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_MITTUINE !!≈ @CODE@ mittuine:mittu
+Interr+Sg+Abl:%>malpäi K ;
+Interr+Sg+Ade:%>mal K ;
+Interr+Sg+All:%>male K ;
+Interr+Sg+Ela:%>maspäi K ;
+Interr+Sg+Ess:%>mannu K ;
+Interr+Sg+Gen:%>man K ;
+Interr+Sg+Ill:%>mah K ;
+Interr+Sg+Ine:%>mas K ;
+Interr+Sg+Nom:ine K ;
+Interr+Sg+Par:%>mua K ;
+Interr+Pl+Abl:%>milpäi K ;
+Interr+Pl+Ade:%>mil K ;
+Interr+Pl+All:%>mile K ;
+Interr+Pl+Ela:%>mispäi K ;
+Interr+Pl+Ess:%>minnu K ;
+Interr+Pl+Gen:%>mien K ;
+Interr+Pl+Ill:%>mih K ;
+Interr+Pl+Ine:%>mis K ;
+Interr+Pl+Nom:%>mat K ;
+Interr+Pl+Par:%>mii K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_KEN !!≈ @CODE@ ken:ke
+Interr+Sem/Hum: PRON-INTERR_KEN-01 ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_KEN-01
+Sg+Ade:l K ;
+Sg+All:lle K ;
+Sg+Com:nenke K ;
+Sg+Gen:nen K ;
+Sg+Nom:n K ;
+Sg+Par:%>dä K ;
+Pl+Nom:t K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR_KARJALAINE
+Interr:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

!! ### REFLEXIVE PRONOUNS
LEXICON PRON-REFL_ !!≈ **@CODE@** iče:ičče
+Refl+Abl:%^WGStem%>lpäi K ; 
+Refl+Ade:%^WGStem%>l K ; 
+Refl+All:%^WGStem%>le K ;
+Refl+All+PxSg1:%^WGStem%>lleni K ;
+Refl+All+PxSg2:%^WGStem%>lles K ;
+Refl+All+PxSg3:%^WGStem%>lleh K ;
+Refl+Ess:%^WGStem%>nny K ;
+Refl+Ess+PxSg3:%>näh K ;
+Refl+Gen:%^WGStem%>n K ;
+Refl+Ill:%>h K ;
+Refl+Ine:%^WGStem%>s K ;
+Refl+Nom:%^WGStem K ;
+Refl+Nom+PxSg1:%>ni K ;
+Refl+Nom+PxSg2:%>s K ;
+Refl+Nom+PxSg3:%>h K ;
+Refl+Par+PxSg1:%>ed%{AÄ%}ni K ;
+Refl+Par+PxSg2:%>ed%{AÄ%}s K ;
+Refl+Par+PxSg3:%>ed%{AÄ%}h K ;
+Refl+Tra+PxSg3:%^WGStem%>kseh K ;
!! iččiedäh, iččedäh, iččeh, ičes, iččenäh, iččiedäs, iččeni,


!! ### RELATIVE PRONOUNS
LEXICON PRON-REL_KUDAI !!≈ @CODE@ kudai:kuda
+Rel:%{back%} NMN_KUDAI ;
+Rel:%{back%} NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI ; !2015-05-21

LEXICON PRON-REFL_IS-SG-PAR
+Refl+Sg+Par: K ;
+Refl+Sg+Par+PxSg3:däh K ;

LEXICON PRON_ARMAS !!≈ @CODE@ armas:arma
:%{back%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES        ;

LEXICON PRON_OZA !!≈ @CODE@ oza:oza
:%{back%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ        ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT_KIELI !!≈ @CODE@ kieli:kiel
+Qnt:%{front%} NMN_SUARI/KIELI ;

LEXICON PRON_KARJALAINE
:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

LEXICON PRON_KIELINE
:%{front%} NMN_NAINE/KIELINE ;

LEXICON PRON_TOINE !!≈ @CODE@ toine:to
:%{back%} NMN_TOINE ;

LEXICON PRON_KAI !!≈ @CODE@ requires developing
:%{back%} PRON_KAI_01 ;
LEXICON PRON_KAI_01
+Pl+Nom: K ;
+Pl+Gen:kkien K ;
+Pl+All:kile K ;
+Pl+Abl:kilpäi K ;
!+Pl+Abl:kil K ;
+Pl+Ade:kil K ;
+Sg+Gen:ken K ;
+Sg+Ine:kes K ;
!+Sg+Ela:kes K ;
+Sg+Ela:kespäi K ;
+Sg+Ade:kel K ;
!+Sg+Abl:kel K ;
+Sg+Abl:kelpäi K ;

LEXICON PRON_ENÄMBI !!≈ @CODE@ enämbi:enämb
:%{front%} NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
