src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
jogahine+Pron:jogahi PRON_KIELINE  "jokainen" ;
iččie+Pron:iččie PRON-REFL_IS-SG-PAR  "itseään" ;
vai% eräs+Pron:vai% erä PRON_ARMAS  "harva" ;
äijä+Pron:äijä PRON_OZA  "monet" ;
meigäläine+Pron:meigälä PRON_KARJALAINE  "meikäläinen" ;
kai+Pron:kai PRON_KAI  "kaikki" ;
ken+Pron:ke PRON-INTERR_KEN  "kuka" ;
toine+Pron:to PRON_TOINE  "toinen" ;
kunne+Pron:kunne PRON-INTERR_  "minne" ;
iče+Pron:ičče PRON-REFL_  "itse" ;
kudai+Pron:kuda PRON-REL_KUDAI  "joka" ;
kugalaine+Pron:kugala PRON-INTERR_KARJALAINE  "mistä kotoisin oleva" ;
mi+Pron:mi PRON-INTERR_MI  "mikä" ;
moni+Pron:mon PRON-QNT_KIELI  "moni" ;
eräs+Pron:erä PRON_ARMAS  "" ;
enämbi+Pron:enämb PRON_ENÄMBI  "enempi" ;
